Twol/apu-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Apurinã morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 
 ã ẽ ĩ ũ ỹ

 á é ó ú í õ
 ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
 Ã Ẽ Ĩ Ũ Ỹ

 Á É Ó Ú Í Õ
 Ç



%{hØ%}:0 !
%{hØ%}:h !
%{yiØ%}:y !
%{yiØ%}:i !
%{yiØ%}:0 !
%{ỹĩØ%}:ỹ !
%{ỹĩØ%}:ĩ !
%{ỹĩØ%}:0 !
%{uũ%}:u !
%{uũ%}:ũ !
%{aã%}:a !
%{aã%}:ã !

%^VowRM:0  !!= __@CODE@__ this will remove stem final vowel
%^VowNasL:0 !!= __@CODE@__ This will nasalize preceding vowel

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


 %>
 %<
 #
 «
 »

;

Sets

 Vow = a e i u y ã ẽ ĩ ũ ỹ ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;

Definitions

PALCns = [n h | x | t x | t s | t h ] ;

NonPALCns = [n [Vow | Cns - [h]]  | Cns - [x|n|t] | t [Cns - [x | s | h] | Vow ] ] ;


Rules

"Deleting %{hØ%}"
  %{hØ%}:0 <=> n _ [%{yiØ%}:y %< NonPALCns | %{yiØ%}:0 %< [Vow - i] ] ;

!! arika+V+ScSg1+Oc3F: __set on fire__
!!€ n%{hØ%}%{yiØ%}%<arika%>ru
!!€ n00%<arika%>ru
!!$ n%{hØ%}%{yiØ%}%<arika%>ru
!!$ nh0%<arika%>ru

"Deleting %{yiØ%}:0 "
 %{yiØ%}:0 <=> [n %{hØ%}:|p | # ] _ %< Vow ;

"Deleting %{ỹĩØ%}:0 "
 %{ỹĩØ%}:0 <=> h _ %< Vow ;

"Deleting stem-final a before NomAct -inhi"
 a:0 <=> _ %^VowRM: %> ;
!! myteka+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: __running/corrida__ 
!!€ myteka%^VowRM%>inhi 
!!€ mytek00%>inhi 

"Realizing %{hØ%}:h "
  %{hØ%}:h <=> n _ [%{yiØ%}:i %< PALCns | %{yiØ%}:0 %< i ] ;
!! nhika+V+ScSg1+Oc3F: __I ate it(Fem)/__
!!€ n%{hØ%}%{yiØ%}%<nhika%>ru
!!€ nhi%<nhika%>ru


"Realizing %{yiØ%}:y "
 %{yiØ%}:y <=> [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< NonPALCns  ;

"Realizing %{yiØ%}:i "
 %{yiØ%}:i <=> [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< PALCns  ;

"Realizing %{yiØ%}:ỹ "
 %{ỹĩØ%}:ỹ <=> h _ %< NonPALCns  ;

"Realizing %{ỹĩØ%}:ĩ "
 %{ỹĩØ%}:ĩ <=> h _ %< PALCns  ;

"non-nasal a"
 %{aã%}:a <=> _ %< Cns  ;

"non-nasal u"
 %{uũ%}:u <=> _ %< Cns  ;

"nasal ã"
 %{aã%}:ã <=> _ %< Vow  ;

"nasal ũ"
 %{uũ%}:ũ <=> _ %< Vow  ;

"nasalization with -ka passive marker"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 Vx:Vy <=>  _ %^VowNasL:0 %> ;
           where Vx in (a e i u)
                 Vy in (ã ẽ ĩ ũ) matched ;

"nasalization with -Ntxi y:ỹ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 y:ỹ <=> _ (y:) %^VowNasL:0 %> NonPALCns ; 


"nasalization with -Ntxi y:ĩ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 y:ĩ <=>
 Cns _ %^VowNasL:0 %> PALCns ; 
  _ y: %^VowNasL:0 %> PALCns ; 
! kywy+N+Sg+Nom+PxNot: __head/cabeça__
!!€ kywy%^VowNasL%>txi
!!€ kywĩ0%>txi
! tsyy+N+Sg+Nom+PxNot: __/dor__
!!€ tsyy%^VowNasL%>txi
!!€ tsĩi0%>txi

!!TESTS
!echo 'n {hØ}:0 {yiØ}:y < t a k a > r y' | hfst-pair-test src/phonology/apu-phon.compose.hfst
!echo 'taka+V+ScSg1+OcSg3M' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst
